dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- মানসিক; মানসিক -->
    <pardef n="মানসিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চকচকে; চকচকে -->
    <pardef n="চকচকে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বহনযোগ্য; বহনযোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="বহনযোগ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- একমাত্র; একমাত্র -->
    <pardef n="একমাত্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সংযুক্ত; সংযুক্ত -->
    <pardef n="সংযুক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উল্লেখযোগ্য; উল্লেখযোগ্য -->
    <pardef n="উল্লেখযোগ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অলসতম; অলস -->
    <pardef n="অলস/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অজানা; অজানা -->
    <pardef n="অজানা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নকশা; নকশা -->
    <pardef n="নকশা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিশ্চিত; নিশ্চিত -->
    <pardef n="নিশ্চিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সামরিক; সামরিক -->
    <pardef n="সামরিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশ্বব্যাপী; বিশ্বব্যাপী -->
    <pardef n="বিশ্বব্যাপী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রাচীনতম; প্রাচীন -->
    <pardef n="প্রাচীন/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পঞ্চম; পঞ্চম -->
    <pardef n="পঞ্চম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রাচীনতর; প্রাচীন -->
    <pardef n="প্রাচীন/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আফগান; আফগান -->
    <pardef n="আফগান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কৌতূহলী; কৌতূহলী -->
    <pardef n="কৌতূহলী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অধীন; অধীন -->
    <pardef n="অধীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অন্ধকার; অন্ধকার -->
    <pardef n="অন্ধকার__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- লাভজনক; লাভজনক -->
    <pardef n="লাভজনক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ব্যস্ত; ব্যস্ত -->
    <pardef n="ব্যস্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- লাগাতার; লাগাতার -->
    <pardef n="লাগাতার__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিশেষতম; বিশেষ -->
    <pardef n="বিশেষ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনুষ্ঠিত; অনুষ্ঠিত -->
    <pardef n="অনুষ্ঠিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- একটি; একটি -->
    <pardef n="একটি__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দীর্ঘ; দীর্ঘ -->
    <pardef n="দীর্ঘ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উদ্ভট; উদ্ভট -->
    <pardef n="উদ্ভট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গুপ্ত; গুপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="গুপ্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তরল; তরল -->
    <pardef n="তরল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নাগরিক; নাগরিক -->
    <pardef n="নাগরিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দ্বিধাবিভক্ত; দ্বিধাবিভক্ত -->
    <pardef n="দ্বিধাবিভক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দার্শনিক; দার্শনিক -->
    <pardef n="দার্শনিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অগ্রিম; অগ্রিম -->
    <pardef n="অগ্রিম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তালিকাভুক্ত; তালিকাভুক্ত -->
    <pardef n="তালিকাভুক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গোছানো; গোছানো -->
    <pardef n="গোছানো__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আফ্রিকান; আফ্রিকান -->
    <pardef n="আফ্রিকান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভক্ত; ভক্ত -->
    <pardef n="ভক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘৃণ্য; ঘৃণ্য -->
    <pardef n="ঘৃণ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="psint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিয়মিতভাবে; নিয়মিতভাবে -->
    <pardef n="নিয়মিতভাবে__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাংস্কৃতিক; সাংস্কৃতিক -->
    <pardef n="সাংস্কৃতিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পছন্দের; পছন্দের -->
    <pardef n="পছন্দের__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সুনির্দিষ্ট; সুনির্দিষ্ট -->
    <pardef n="সুনির্দিষ্ট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="মানসিক"><i>মানসিক</i><par n="মানসিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চকচকে"><i>চকচকে</i><par n="চকচকে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বহনযোগ্য"><i>বহনযোগ্য</i><par n="বহনযোগ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="একমাত্র"><i>একমাত্র</i><par n="একমাত্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সংযুক্ত"><i>সংযুক্ত</i><par n="সংযুক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উল্লেখযোগ্য"><i>উল্লেখযোগ্য</i><par n="উল্লেখযোগ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অলসতম"><i>অলস</i><par n="অলস/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অজানা"><i>অজানা</i><par n="অজানা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নকশা"><i>নকশা</i><par n="নকশা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিশ্চিত"><i>নিশ্চিত</i><par n="নিশ্চিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সামরিক"><i>সামরিক</i><par n="সামরিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশ্বব্যাপী"><i>বিশ্বব্যাপী</i><par n="বিশ্বব্যাপী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাচীনতম"><i>প্রাচীন</i><par n="প্রাচীন/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পঞ্চম"><i>পঞ্চম</i><par n="পঞ্চম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাচীনতর"><i>প্রাচীন</i><par n="প্রাচীন/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আফগান"><i>আফগান</i><par n="আফগান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কৌতূহলী"><i>কৌতূহলী</i><par n="কৌতূহলী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অধীন"><i>অধীন</i><par n="অধীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অন্ধকার"><i>অন্ধকার</i><par n="অন্ধকার__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="লাভজনক"><i>লাভজনক</i><par n="লাভজনক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যস্ত"><i>ব্যস্ত</i><par n="ব্যস্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="লাগাতার"><i>লাগাতার</i><par n="লাগাতার__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশেষতম"><i>বিশেষ</i><par n="বিশেষ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুষ্ঠিত"><i>অনুষ্ঠিত</i><par n="অনুষ্ঠিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="একটি"><i>একটি</i><par n="একটি__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দীর্ঘ"><i>দীর্ঘ</i><par n="দীর্ঘ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উদ্ভট"><i>উদ্ভট</i><par n="উদ্ভট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গুপ্ত"><i>গুপ্ত</i><par n="গুপ্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তরল"><i>তরল</i><par n="তরল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নাগরিক"><i>নাগরিক</i><par n="নাগরিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দ্বিধাবিভক্ত"><i>দ্বিধাবিভক্ত</i><par n="দ্বিধাবিভক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দার্শনিক"><i>দার্শনিক</i><par n="দার্শনিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অগ্রিম"><i>অগ্রিম</i><par n="অগ্রিম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তালিকাভুক্ত"><i>তালিকাভুক্ত</i><par n="তালিকাভুক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গোছানো"><i>গোছানো</i><par n="গোছানো__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আফ্রিকান"><i>আফ্রিকান</i><par n="আফ্রিকান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভক্ত"><i>ভক্ত</i><par n="ভক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘৃণ্য"><i>ঘৃণ্য</i><par n="ঘৃণ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিয়মিতভাবে"><i>নিয়মিতভাবে</i><par n="নিয়মিতভাবে__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাংস্কৃতিক"><i>সাংস্কৃতিক</i><par n="সাংস্কৃতিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পছন্দের"><i>পছন্দের</i><par n="পছন্দের__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সুনির্দিষ্ট"><i>সুনির্দিষ্ট</i><par n="সুনির্দিষ্ট__adj"/></e>
